Tennessee, session 114, SB0250.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 39, Chapter 17, Part 13, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) A person commits an offense who recklessly stores a firearm in a manner
that the person knows or reasonably should know will allow a child younger than
eighteen (18) years of age to access the firearm and the child brings the firearm to a
school in violation of § 39-17-1309.
(b) A violation of this section is a Class A misdemeanor.
(c) As used in this section, "school" means a public or private school building or
bus, on any public or private school campus, grounds, recreation area, athletic field, or
any other property owned, operated, or while in use by any board of education, school,
college or university board of trustees, regents, or directors for the administration of any
public or private educational institution.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0250
000610
- 1 -